seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="ब/ी__n_nt">
      <e>     <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ि<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ि<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>िया</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ियां<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ियां<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ब/ी__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ि<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ि<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>िया</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ियां<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ियां<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="भा/ऊ__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वा<j/></l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वा<j/></l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वां<j/></l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वां<j/></l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="बा/ई__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>या</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>यां<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>यां<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="स/सा__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l>सा</l><r>सा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>श्या<j/></l><r>सा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>श्या<j/></l><r>सा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>से</l><r>सा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>श्यां<j/></l><r>सा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>श्यां<j/></l><r>सा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="माण/ूस__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l>ूस</l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>सा<j/></l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>सा<j/></l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>से</l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>सं</l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>सां<j/></l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>सां<j/></l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="पा/ऊस__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l>ऊस</l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वसा<j/></l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वसा<j/></l><r>ूस<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- verbs -->

    <pardef n="__vblex_impfv">
      <!-- impfv -->
      <e>     <p><l>तो</l><r>तो<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ते</l><r>ते<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>तो</l><r>तो<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>तोस</l><r>तोस<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>तेस</l><r>तेस<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ता</l><r>ता<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>तो</l><r>तो<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ते</l><r>ते<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ते</l><r>ते<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>तं</l><r>तं<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>तात</l><r>तात<s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="माणूस">              <i>माण</i><par n="माण/ूस__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="ससा">              <i>स</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="घसा">              <i>घ</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="ठसा">              <i>ठ</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="ठोसा">              <i>ठौ</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="अडुळसा">            <i>अडुळस</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="पैसा">              <i>पै</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="वारसा">              <i>वार</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="दिलासा">              <i>दिला</i><par n="स/सा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="चाई">                            <i>चा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="विणाई">                          <i>विणा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="मोंगलाई">                        <i>मोंगला</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="लग्नसराई">                       <i>लग्नसरा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="कोल्हेकुई">                      <i>कोल्हेकु</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="तिजाई">                          <i>तिजा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="दिलजमाई">                        <i>दिलजमा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="आई">                             <i>आ</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="चपळाई">                          <i>चपळा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="कुचराई">                         <i>कुचरा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="स्वस्ताई">                       <i>स्वस्ता</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="लगीनघाई">                        <i>लगीनघा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="रुई">                            <i>रु</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="मरीआई">                          <i>मरीआ</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="नुकसानभरपाई">                    <i>नुकसानभरपा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="राई">                            <i>रा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="थंडाई">                          <i>थंडा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="चौथाई">                          <i>चौथा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="बाई">                            <i>बा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="केसरबाई">                        <i>केसरबा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="बारभाई">                         <i>बारभा</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="जुई">                            <i>जु</i><par n="बा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="भ‌ाऊ">               <i>भा</i><par n="भा/ऊ__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="भोजनभ‌ाऊ">               <i>भोजनभा</i><par n="भा/ऊ__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="बी">                          <i>ब</i><par n="ब/ी__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="लोणी">                          <i>लोण</i><par n="ब/ी__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="भिलाटी">                          <i>भिलाट</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="फी">                          <i>फ</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="लोणी">                          <i>लोण</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="स्त्री">                          <i>स्त्र</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="तिपायी">                          <i>तिपाय</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="परस्त्री">                          <i>परस्त्र</i><par n="ब/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="पाऊस">                           <i>पा</i><par n="पा/ऊस__n_m" /></e>
